Washington statutes.
RCW 18.108.220

Federal classification.

For the purposes of this chapter, licensed massage therapists shall be classified as "offices and clinics of health practitioners, not elsewhere classified" under section 8049 of the standard industrial classification manual published by the executive office of the president, office of management and budget.

[ 2016 c 41 s 13; 1994 c 228 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 c 41: See note following RCW 18.108.010.

Effective date—1994 c 228: "This act shall take effect July 1, 1994." [ 1994 c 228 s 3.]